South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4623.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 7, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-7-2335. (A) The department and a child-placing agency that contracts with the department may not require a foster parent to: (1) disclose the specific types of firearms that are present in the home; or (2) notify the child-placing agency if there is any change in the types of firearms that are present in the home. (B) If the department or a child-placing agency that contracts with the department has or obtains information relating to the types of firearms that are present in a foster parent's home, the department or child-placing agency may not use that information for any purpose other than determining whether there are firearms present in the home. (C) A child-placing agency that violates subsection (B) is liable to the State for a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars for each violation. The attorney general may bring an action to recover a civil penalty authorized under this subsection and may also seek equitable relief from the court. (D) Information relating to the types of firearms that are present in a foster parent's home is confidential and is exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----